Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF32.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1067YH (2) 91 da/ns H.F. 32 Section 1. Section 137F.1, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. a. âFood processing plantâ means a any of the 3 following: 4 (1) A commercial operation that manufactures, packages, 5 labels, or stores food for human consumption and does not 6 provide food directly to a consumer for distribution or sale on 7 a wholesale basis . 8 (2) An operation located on the premises of a farm or 9 private residence that stores officially processed packaged 10 meat or poultry raised by the licensee and offered for sale on 11 a wholesale or retail basis. 12 b. âFood processing plantâ does not include any of the 13 following: 14 a. (1) A premises covered by a class âAâ beer permit as 15 provided in chapter 123 . 16 b. (2) A premises of a residence in which honey is stored; 17 prepared; packaged, including by placement in a container; 18 labeled; or from which honey is distributed. 19 c. (3) A premises covered by a class âAâ wine permit as 20 provided in chapter 123 . 21 d. (1) (4) (a) The premises of a raw milk dairy where raw 22 milk is produced, processed, labeled, marketed, or distributed 23 by a raw milk producer in compliance with chapter 195 . 24 (2) (b) A premises of a raw milk dairy where a raw milk 25 product or raw milk dairy product is manufactured, labeled, 26 marketed, or distributed by a raw milk producer in compliance 27 with chapter 195 . 28 Sec. 2. Section 137F.6, subsection 1, paragraph g, Code 29 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 30 lieu thereof the following: 31 g. (1) Except as provided in subparagraph (2), for a food 32 processing plant, the annual license fee shall correspond to 33 the annual gross food and beverage sales of the food processing 34 plant, as follows: 35 -1- LSB 1067YH (2) 91 da/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 32 (a) For annual gross sales of less than two hundred thousand 1 dollars, one hundred fifty dollars. 2 (b) For annual gross sales of at least two hundred thousand 3 dollars but less than two million dollars, three hundred 4 dollars. 5 (c) For annual gross sales of two million dollars or more, 6 five hundred dollars. 7 (2) For a food processing plant operating on the premises of 8 a farm or private residence that stores officially processed 9 packaged meat or poultry derived from animals raised by the 10 licensee and offered for sale on a wholesale or retail basis, 11 the license fee is seventy-five dollars. 12